Utah statutes.
78B-3-904.   Juries.

(1)  Juries in expedited jury trial cases shall be composed of no less than six jurors with no alternates.

(2)  Nothing in this part is intended to preclude a jury from deliberating as long as needed.



Enacted by Chapter 111, 2011 General Session

